Oklahoma, session 2025, SB754.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5060.46 of Title 74, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Oklahoma Center for the Advancement of Science and


Technology (OCAST), with the participation and advice of the


Oklahoma Science and Technology Research and Development Board and


approval from OCAST, shall establish the Doctoral Retention Grant


Program. The program shall include development of competitive


grants to be awarded to applicants seeking to stay in Oklahoma to

Req. No. 235 Page 1


further the mission of OCAST. OCAST and the Board shall examine


best practices in other states to facilitate the framework of the


program. OCAST shall administer the program.


B. No grants shall be developed or awarded under the provisions


of this program that would duplicate existing incentive


opportunities in this state.


C. In the administration of the program authorized by this


section, OCAST shall secure service testing data to ensure


recipients provide the service or services proposed by such


recipients when applying for such grants.


D. All grant awards authorized pursuant to the provisions of


this section shall include a clawback provision. For purposes of


this subsection, “clawback provision” means a condition precedent to


participate in the program whereby a grant recipient formally agrees


to reimburse the program all or part of a grant award upon the


failure of the recipient to fulfill contract terms included in the


grant award.


E. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving


fund for OCAST to be designated the “Doctoral Retention Grant


Program Revolving Fund”. The revolving fund shall be a continuing


fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of


all monies designated for deposit to the fund. All monies accruing


to the credit of the revolving fund are hereby appropriated and may


be budgeted and expended by OCAST for purposes of awarding grants by

Req. No. 235 Page 2


and through OCAST pursuant to subsection A of this section and for


the operating expenses of OCAST.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-235 MR 1/19/2025 5:42:35 AM







































Req. No. 235 Page 3